Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5145.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10h. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall not allow self-attestation for proof of identity, income, and Michigan residency during the initial application and subsequent annual determination for eligibility under any public assistance program. The department shall require an applicant for public assistance to provide verifiable documentation of identity, income, and Michigan residency. Verifiable documentation required under this section includes, but is not limited to, any of the following documents: (a) For proof of identity, any of the following: (i) A driver license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. (ii) An enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (iii) An official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300. (iv) A birth certificate, a Social Security card, a voter registration card, or any other government-issued document that establishes identity, if an applicant is unable to reasonably obtain a document described in subparagraphs (i) to (iii). (b) For proof of income, any of the following: (i) A pay stub, W-2 form, or copy or transcript of federal income tax return. (ii) An award letter or benefits statement from the Social Security Administration, Department of Veterans Affairs, or other government agency providing benefits to the applicant. (iii) If a document described under subparagraph (i) or (ii) is unavailable, a written verification from an employer, financial institution, or other third-party entity with direct knowledge of the applicant's income. (c) For proof of Michigan residency, any of the following: (i) A current lease agreement, mortgage statement, or utility bill that shows the applicant's name and Michigan address. (ii) A state or federal government benefit letter, a vehicle registration, or an insurance statement that lists the applicant's Michigan address. (iii) A document issued by a Michigan educational institution or medical facility that verifies the applicant's Michigan residency. (2) If the department determines that eligibility for public assistance cannot be verified using the documentation provided by the applicant, the department shall use collateral contacts, data matches with other state or federal agencies, or other readily available documentary evidence to verify eligibility before denying assistance. (3) The department shall update the department's MI Bridges online application portal to require the uploading of a verifiable documentation before determining eligibility for public assistance.